Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0229

"Fishing derby."

"Fishing derby," as used in this chapter, means a fishing contest, with or without the payment or giving of an entry fee or other consideration by some or all of the contestants, wherein prizes are awarded for the species, size, weight, or quality of fish caught in a bona fide fishing or recreational event.

[ 1987 c 4 s 9. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(8).]